src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/adj-luojk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Evensyllable adjectives that belong to 

# With attribute -s.

Tests:

  Adjective - senijlla: # 
    senijlla+A+Attr: [senijla]
    senijlla+A+Sg+Nom: [senijlla]
    senijlla+A+Sg+Acc: [senijlav]
    senijlla+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [senijlap]
    senijlla+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [senijlamus]
    senijlla+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [senijlabut]
    senijlla+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [senijlamusát]
    senijlla+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [senijlabusj]
    senijlla+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [senijlabuttjat]
    senijlla+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [senijlat]
    senijlla+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: []
    
  Adjective - ekvivalænnta: # DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM
    ekvivalænnta+A+Attr: [ekvivalenta]
    ekvivalænnta+A+Sg+Nom: [ekvivalännta, ekvivalænnta]
    ekvivalænnta+A+Sg+Com: [ekvivalentajn]
    ekvivalænnta+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [ekvivalentap]
    ekvivalænnta+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [ekvivalentamus]
    ekvivalænnta+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [ekvivalentabusj]
    ekvivalænnta+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [ekvivalentabuttjat]
    ekvivalænnta+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: ekvivalentat
    ekvivalænnta+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - destruktijvalasj: # DEMONSTRATIJVA_LASJ_NO_NORM
    destruktijvva+A+Attr:  [destruktijva]
    destruktijvva+A+Sg+Nom: destruktijvva
    destruktijvva+A+Sg+Ela:  destruktijvas
    destruktijvva+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: destruktijvap
    destruktijvva+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: destruktijvamus
